Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.271

Light truck.

"Light truck" means a motor vehicle manufactured as a truck with a declared gross weight of twelve thousand pounds or less.

[ 2010 c 161 s 122.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.